Hawaii statutes.
§304A-1754 Penalty for breach of contract.
A person who is placed in the residency program under this subpart, but who
breaches any term of the contract under section 304A-1753, shall pay to the
State damages of $10,000; provided that a contract shall not be deemed breached
if the person has obtained a permanent license to practice medicine and surgery
or osteopathy under chapter 453 but could not fulfill the requirements of
section 304A-1753(3) and (4) because no employment vacancy existed in the
correctional facilities of the department of public safety or no shortage of
physicians or osteopathic physicians existed in any rural community and the
department of public safety or the department of health, as applicable,
certifies that no employment vacancy or shortage existed. [L 2006, c 75, pt of
§2; am L 2009, c 11, §31]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next